Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 1

Extradition

33-9-101. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Executive authority,” “governor” and “chief magistrate,” respectively, as applied to a request to return any person under this part to or from the District of Columbia, include a justice of the supreme court of the District of Columbia and other authority;

“Flight” and “fled” mean any voluntary or involuntary departure from the jurisdiction of the court where the proceedings mentioned may have been instituted and are still pending, with the effect of avoiding, impounding, or delaying the action of the court in which the proceedings may have been instituted or are pending, or any such departure from the state where the person demanded then was, if the person then was under detention by law as a person with mental illness and subject to detention; and

“State” includes states, territories, districts and insular and other possessions of the United States.

Acts 1917, ch. 115, § 2; Shan., §§ 5499a2-5499a4; Code 1932, §§ 9660-9662; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 33-1001 — 33-1003; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 33-9-101 — 33-9-109, 33-9-201 — 33-9-206 (Acts 1917, ch. 115, §§ 2-6; Shan., §§ 5499a2-5499a12; Code 1932, §§ 9660-9670; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 33-1001 — 33-1011; Acts 1971, ch. 364, §§ 1-6; T.C.A., §§ 33-1501 — 33-1506), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Definitions applicable throughout title, § 33-1-101.

33-9-102. Persons subject to extradition.

A person alleged to be mentally ill who is found in this state, having fled from another state, shall, on demand of the executive authority of the state from which the person fled, be presented for return, if at the time of the person’s flight:

The person was under detention by law in a facility as a mentally ill person;

The person had been previously determined by legal proceedings to be mentally ill, the finding being unreversed and in full force and effect, and the control of the person having been acquired by a court of competent jurisdiction of the state from which the person fled; or

The person was subject to detention in the state, being then the person’s legal domicile, personal service of process having been made, based on legal proceedings pending there to have the person declared mentally ill.

Acts 1917, ch. 115, § 3; Shan., § 5499a5; Code 1932, § 9663; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 33-1004; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-9-103. Procedure.

Whenever the executive authority of any state demands of the executive authority of this state any fugitive under § 33-9-102, and produces a copy of the commitment, decree or other judicial process and proceedings, certified as authentic by the governor or chief magistrate of the state from which the person so charged has fled, with an affidavit made before a proper officer showing the person to be a fugitive, it shall be the duty of the executive authority of this state to cause the person to be apprehended and secured, if found in this state, and to cause immediate notice of the apprehension to be given to the executive authority making the demand, or to the agent of the authority appointed to receive the fugitive and to deliver the fugitive to the agent when the person appears.

Acts 1917, ch. 115, § 4; Shan., § 5499a6; Code 1932, § 9664; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 33-1005; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-9-104. Fugitive discharged if no agent appears.

If the agent does not appear within thirty (30) days from the time of the apprehension, the fugitive may be discharged.

Acts 1917, ch. 115, § 4; Shan., § 5499a7; Code 1932, § 9665; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 33-1006; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-9-105. Costs.

All costs and expenses incurred in apprehending, securing, maintaining, and transmitting the fugitive to the state making the demand, shall be paid by that state.

Acts 1917, ch. 115, § 4; Shan., § 5499a8; Code 1932, § 9666; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 33-1007; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-9-106. Power of agent.

An appointed agent who receives the fugitive into custody shall be empowered to transmit the person to the state from which the person fled.

Acts 1917, ch. 115, § 4; Shan., § 5499a9; Code 1932, § 9667; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 33-1008; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-9-107. Governor may demand return of fugitives.

The executive authority is vested with the power, on the application of any person interested, to demand the return to this state of any fugitive under this part.

Acts 1917, ch. 115, § 4; Shan., § 5499a10; Code 1932, § 9668; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 33-1009; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-9-108. Statute of limitations.

Any proceedings under this part shall begin within one (1) year after the flight referred to in this part.

Acts 1917, ch. 115, § 5; Shan., § 5499a11; Code 1932, § 9669; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 33-1010; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 29; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-9-109. Interpretation and construction of part.

This part shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact it.

Acts 1917, ch. 115, § 6; Shan., § 5499a12; Code 1932, § 9670; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 33-1011; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.